Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.180

Authority of director to issue rules, forms, orders, interpretive opinions.

The director may make, amend, and repeal rules, forms, and orders as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The director may honor requests for interpretive opinions.

[ 1981 c 155 s 17.]